Massachusetts, session 194th, S1202.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 131 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by striking out section 5C and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 5C. The citizens of the Commonwealth shall have the right to harvest fish and
wildlife free from harassment subject to rules and regulations established to maintain sustainable
and healthy populations of such natural resources.
(a) No person shall obstruct, interfere with or otherwise prevent the lawful harvest of fish
and wildlife by another at any such place in the commonwealth where it is lawful to do so. It
shall be a violation of this section for a person to intentionally:
(1) drive or disturb fish or wildlife for the purpose of interrupting a lawful taking; or
of 3

(2) block, follow, impede or otherwise harass another who is engaged in the lawful taking
of fish or wildlife; or
(3) use natural or artificial visual, aural, olfactory or physical stimulus to effect wildlife in
order to hinder or prevent such taking; or
(4) erect barriers with the intent to deny ingress or egress to areas where the lawful taking
of wildlife may occur; or
(5) interject himself into the line of fire; or
(6) effect the condition or placement of personal or public property intended for use in
the taking of wildlife; or
(7) enter or remain upon public lands, or upon private lands without the permission of the
owner or his agent, with intent to violate this section; or
(8) verbally or physically harass, threaten or other means of intimidation of an
individual/s lawfully engaged in the harvest fish and wildlife;
(9) utilize mechanical aerial devices to drive wildlife, harass, film, photograph or
otherwise intimidate.
A violation of this paragraph shall be punished by imprisonment in a jail or house of
correction for not more than 1 year or by a fine of not more than $1,000 or both.
(b) Any person having caused destruction or otherwise vandalizes equipment utilized,
directly or indirectly, for the lawful harvest of fish and wildlife including, but not limited to,
vehicles, blinds, stands, trail cams, fishing gear, boats, etc. shall be punished by imprisonment in
of 3

a jail or house of correction for not more than 2 years or by a fine of not more than $5,000 or
both.
(c) Any person having caused bodily injuries of another that were sustained from any
type of harassment or vandalism covered under this section shall be punished by imprisonment in
a jail or house of correction for not more than 5 years or by a fine of not more than $10,000 or
both.
The superior court shall have jurisdiction to issue an injunction to enjoin any such
conduct or conspiracy in violation of the provisions of this section. A person who sustains
damage as a result of any act which is in violation of this section may bring a civil action for
punitive damages in addition to the penalties established herein. Environmental protection
officers and other law enforcement officers with arrest powers shall be authorized to enforce the
provisions of this section.
(d) Unless authorized by the property owner it shall be unlawful to post land closed, or
restricted, to the lawful harvest of fish and wildlife. Any person convicted of illegally posting
land shall be punished by imprisonment in a jail or house of correction for not more than 1 year
or a fine of not more $1,000 or both.
Any fines collected under this section shall be deposited into the Inland Fisheries and
Game Fund established under section 2C of chapter 131 and may be utilized for the purposes of
the Hunter Education Program.
of 3